West Virginia, session 2025, SB689.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 8. State sovereignty Act of 2025. §1-8-1. Title. This act shall be titled "State Sovereignty Act of 2025." §1-8-2. Rejection of jurisdiction of the World Health Organization, the United Nations, and the World Economic Form. (a) The World Health Organization, the United Nations, and the World Economic Forum have no jurisdiction in this state. The state of West Virginia and its political subdivisions, including, but not limited to, counties, cities, towns, precincts, water districts, school districts, school administrative units, or quasi-public entities, shall not be compelled to engage in the enforcement of, or any collaboration with the enforcement of, any requirements or mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United Nations, or the World Economic Forum. (b) Any requirements or mandates issued by the World Health Organization, the United Nations, or the World Economic Forum shall not be used in this state as a basis for action, nor to direct, order, or otherwise impose, contrary to the constitution and laws of this state, any requirements whatsoever, including those for masks, vaccines, or medical testing, or gather any public or private information about the state’s citizens or residents, and shall have no force or effect in this state.